Washington statutes.
RCW 18.50.135

Rules.

The secretary shall promulgate rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

[ 1991 c 3 s 113; 1981 c 53 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1981 c 53: See note following RCW 18.50.005.